src/fst/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
LEXICON нсв_7b/b_(-т-)_ё
+V+Impf+IV: Impf_Infи_C_end ;
+V+Impf+IV: Impf_Pres_1_end ;
+V+Impf+TV: Impf_Infи_C_end_w/Pass ;
+V+Impf+TV: Impf_Pres_1_end_w/Pass ;

LEXICON нсв_7b/b_(-т-)9_ё
+V+Impf+IV: Impf_Infи_C_end9 ;
+V+Impf+IV: Impf_Pres_1_end ;
+V+Impf+TV: Impf_Infи_C_end9 ;
+V+Impf+TV: Impf_Pres_1_end ;

LEXICON нсв_7b/b_(-т-)_ё_R
+V+Impf+IV: Impf_Infи_end_R ;
+V+Impf+IV: Impf_Pres_1_end_R ;

LEXICON нсв_нп_7b/b_безл.
+V+Impf+IV+Inf:езти́ # ;
+V+Impf+IV:ёз Past_end_безл. ;
! +V+Impf+IV+Prs:ез PresFut_1_end_безл. ;

LEXICON нсв_нп_7b/b_(-ст-)_прош._рос,_росла/,_ро/сший
+V+Impf+IV+Inf:асти́ # ;
+V+Impf+IV:о́с Past_end ;
+V+Impf+IV:о́с Impf_PastVrbAdv_C ;
+V+Impf+IV:о́с PastAct ;
+V+Impf+IV:аст Impf_Pres_1_end ;

LEXICON нсв_нп_7b/b_(-д-)_ё_(но_прич._прош._е/дший)
+V+Impf+IV+Inf:ед%<ти́ # ;
+V+Impf+IV:ёд Past_end ;
+V+Impf+IV:е́%^d Impf_PastVrbAdv_C ;
+V+Impf+IV:е́%^d PastAct ;
+V+Impf+IV:ёд Impf_Pres_1_end ;

LEXICON нсв_нп_7b/b_(-т-)_ё_(но_прич._прош._е/тший)
+V+Impf+IV+Inf:ет%<ти́ # ;
+V+Impf+IV:ёт Past_end ;
+V+Impf+IV:е́т Impf_PastVrbAdv_C ;
+V+Impf+IV:е́%^t PastAct ;
+V+Impf+IV:ёт Impf_Pres_1_end ;

LEXICON св_нп_7b/b
+V+Perf+IV: Perf_Infи_C_end ;
+V+Perf+IV: Perf_Fut_1_end ;

LEXICON св_нп_7b/b_(-т-)_безл.
+V+Perf+IV: Perf_Infи_C_end_безл. ;
+V+Perf+IV: Perf_Fut_1_end_безл. ;

LEXICON св_нп_7b/b_безл.
+V+Perf+IV: Perf_Infи_C_end_безл. ;
+V+Perf+IV: Perf_Fut_1_end_безл. ;

LEXICON св_нп_7b/b_(-ст-)_прош._ро/с,_-ла/,_-ший
+V+Perf+IV+Inf:асти́ # ;
+V+Perf+IV:о́с Past_end ;
+V+Perf+IV:о́с Perf_PastVrbAdv_C ;
+V+Perf+IV:о́с PastAct ;
+V+Perf+IV:аст Perf_Fut_1_end ;

LEXICON св_7b/b_(-ст-)_R_прош._ро/сся,_росла/сь,_ро/сшийся
+V+Perf+IV+Inf:асти́сь # ;
+V+Perf+IV:о́с Past_end_R ;
+V+Perf+IV:о́с Perf_PastVrbAdv_R ;
+V+Perf+IV:о́с PastAct_R ;
+V+Perf+IV:аст Perf_Fut_1_end_R ;

LEXICON св_7b/b_(-б-)_ё
св_нп_7b/b_(-б-)_ё ;
+V+Perf+TV:ёб Perf_Infи_C_end ;
+V+Perf+TV:еб Perf_Fut_1_end ;
+V+Perf+TV:ебё PastPass_нн_end ;

LEXICON св_нп_7b/b_(-б-)_ё
+V+Perf+IV:ёб Perf_Infи_C_end ;
+V+Perf+IV:еб Perf_Fut_1_end ;

LEXICON св_7b/b_(-д-)9
св_нп_7b/b_(-д-)9 ;
+V+Perf+TV: Perf_Infи_C_end9 ;
+V+Perf+TV: Perf_Fut_1_end ;
+V+Perf+TV:ё PastPass_нн_end ;

LEXICON св_нп_7b/b_(-д-)9
+V+Perf+IV: Perf_Infи_C_end9 ;
+V+Perf+IV: Perf_Fut_1_end ;

LEXICON св_7b/b_(-б-)_ё_R
+V+Perf+IV:ёб Perf_Infи_end_R ;
+V+Perf+IV:еб Perf_Fut_1_end_R ;

LEXICON св_7b/b_(-д-)9_ё_(но_прич._прош._е/дший) ! завести, etc.
св_нп_7b/b_(-д-)9_ё_(но_прич._прош._е/дший) ;
+V+Perf+TV+Inf:ести́ # ;
+V+Perf+TV:ёд Past_end ;
+V+Perf+TV:ёд PastVrbAdv_9_end ;
+V+Perf+TV+Fut:ед PresFut_1_end ;
! +V+Perf+TV+Imp+Pl1:едём # ;
+V+Perf+TV:ед Imper_stressed ; 
+V+Perf+TV:е́%^d PastAct ;
+V+Perf+TV:едё PastPass_нн_end ;

LEXICON св_нп_7b/b_(-д-)9_ё_(но_прич._прош._е/дший)
+V+Perf+IV+Inf:ести́ # ;
+V+Perf+IV:ёд Past_end ;
+V+Perf+IV:ёд PastVrbAdv_9_end ;
+V+Perf+IV+Fut:ед PresFut_1_end ;
! +V+Perf+IV+Imp+Pl1:едём # ;
+V+Perf+IV:ед Imper_stressed ; 
+V+Perf+IV:е́%^d PastAct ;

LEXICON св_7b/b_(-д-)9_ё_R_(но_прич._прош._е/дшийся)_прош._м_вёл ! завестись, etc.
+V+Perf+IV+Inf:ести́сь # ;
+V+Perf+IV:ёд Past_end_R ;
+V+Perf+IV:ёд PastVrbAdv_9_end_R ;
+V+Perf+IV+Fut:ед PresFut_1_end_R ;
! +V+Perf+IV+Imp+Pl1:едёмся # ;
+V+Perf+IV:ед Imper_stressed_R ; 
+V+Perf+IV:е́%^d PastAct_R ;

LEXICON св_7b/b_(-д-)_R_безл.
+V+Perf+IV+Inf:ести́сь # ;
+V+Perf+IV:ё%^d Past_end_R_безл. ;
+V+Perf+IV+Fut:ед PresFut_1_end_R_безл. ;
+V+Perf+IV:ед Imper_stressed_R ; 

LEXICON св_7b/b_(-с-)
св_нп_7b/b_(-с-) ;
+V+Perf+TV: Perf_Infи_C_end ;
+V+Perf+TV: Perf_Fut_1_end ;
+V+Perf+TV:ё PastPass_нн_end ;

LEXICON св_нп_7b/b_(-с-)
+V+Perf+IV: Perf_Infи_C_end ;
+V+Perf+IV: Perf_Fut_1_end ;

LEXICON св_7b/b_(-с-)_R
+V+Perf+IV: Perf_Infи_end_R ;
+V+Perf+IV: Perf_Fut_1_end_R ;

LEXICON св_7b/b_R
+V+Perf+IV: Perf_Infи_end_R ;
+V+Perf+IV: Perf_Fut_1_end_R ;

LEXICON св_7b/b_(-д-)_R
св_7b/b_R ;

LEXICON св_7b/bs
св_нп_7b/b ;
+V+Perf+TV: Perf_Infи_C_end ;
+V+Perf+TV: Perf_Fut_1_end ;
+V+Perf+TV:ё PastPass_нн_end_Prb ;

LEXICON св_7b/b_(-с-)_ё
св_нп_7b/b_(-с-)_ё ;
+V+Perf+TV:ёс Perf_Infи_C_end ;
+V+Perf+TV:ес Perf_Fut_1_end ;
+V+Perf+TV:есё PastPass_нн_end ;

LEXICON св_нп_7b/b_(-с-)_ё
+V+Perf+IV:ёс Perf_Infи_C_end ;
+V+Perf+IV:ес Perf_Fut_1_end ;

LEXICON св_7b/b9_ё
св_нп_7b/b9_ё ;
+V+Perf+TV: Perf_Infи_C_end9 ;
+V+Perf+TV: Perf_Fut_1_end ;
+V+Perf+TV:ё PastPass_нн_end ;

LEXICON св_нп_7b/b9_ё
+V+Perf+IV: Perf_Infи_C_end9 ;
+V+Perf+IV: Perf_Fut_1_end ;

LEXICON св_7b/b_(-с-)9_ё
св_нп_7b/b_(-с-)9_ё ;
+V+Perf+TV:ёс Perf_Infи_C_end9 ;
+V+Perf+TV:ес Perf_Fut_1_end ;
+V+Perf+TV:есё PastPass_нн_end ;

LEXICON св_нп_7b/b_(-с-)9_ё
+V+Perf+IV:ёс Perf_Infи_C_end9 ;
+V+Perf+IV:ес Perf_Fut_1_end ;

LEXICON св_7b/b_(-с-)9_ё_R
+V+Perf+IV:ёс Perf_Infи_end9_R ;
+V+Perf+IV:ес Perf_Fut_1_end_R ;

LEXICON св_7b/b_(-т-)9_ё
св_нп_7b/b_(-т-)9_ё ;
+V+Perf+TV:ё%^t Perf_Infи_C_end9 ;
+V+Perf+TV:ет Perf_Fut_1_end ;
+V+Perf+TV:етё PastPass_нн_end ;

LEXICON св_7b/b_(-т-)9_-честь
+V+Perf+IV: Perf_Infёт-е́сть_C_end9 ;
+V+Perf+IV:т Perf_Fut_1_end ;
+V+Perf+TV: Perf_Infёт-е́сть_C_end9 ;
+V+Perf+TV:т Perf_Fut_1_end ;
+V+Perf+TV:тё PastPass_нн_end ;

LEXICON св_нп_7b/b_(-т-)9_ё
+V+Perf+IV:ё%^t Perf_Infи_C_end9 ;
+V+Perf+IV:ет Perf_Fut_1_end ;

LEXICON св_7b/b_(-т-)9_ё_(но_прич._прош._е/тший)
+V+Perf+TV+Inf:ести́ # ;
+V+Perf+TV:ёт Past_end ;
+V+Perf+TV:ёт PastVrbAdv_9_end ;
+V+Perf+TV+Fut:ет PresFut_1_end ;
! +V+Perf+TV+Imp+Pl1:етём # ;
+V+Perf+TV:ет Imper_stressed ; 
+V+Perf+TV:е́%^t PastAct ;
+V+Perf+IV+Inf:ести́ # ;
+V+Perf+IV:ёт Past_end ;
+V+Perf+IV:ёт PastVrbAdv_9_end ;
+V+Perf+IV+Fut:ет PresFut_1_end ;
! +V+Perf+IV+Imp+Pl1:етём # ;
+V+Perf+IV:ет Imper_stressed ; 
+V+Perf+IV:е́%^t PastAct ;
+V+Perf+TV:етё PastPass_нн_end ;

LEXICON св_7b/c_(-д-)
+V+Perf+IV: Perf_Inf_V_shift ;
+V+Perf+IV: Perf_Fut_1_end ;
+V+Perf+TV: Perf_Inf_V_shift ;
+V+Perf+TV: Perf_Fut_1_end ;
+V+Perf+TV:ё PastPass_нн_end ;

!- - - - - - - Stem type 7 Lexicalized participial forms- - - - - - - 

LEXICON св_7b/b_(-т-)9_-честь_Lxc
+V+Perf+IV: Perf_Infёт-е́сть_C_end9_Lxc ;
+V+Perf+IV:т Perf_Fut_1_end ;
+V+Perf+TV: Perf_Infёт-е́сть_C_end9_Lxc ;
+V+Perf+TV:т Perf_Fut_1_end ;
+V+Perf+TV:тё PastPass_нн_end_Lxc ;

LEXICON св_7b/b_(-т-)9_ё_Lxc
св_нп_7b/b_(-т-)9_ё_Lxc ;
+V+Perf+TV:ё%^t Perf_Infи_C_end9_Lxc ;
+V+Perf+TV:ет Perf_Fut_1_end ;
+V+Perf+TV:етё PastPass_нн_end_Lxc ;

LEXICON Perf_Infёт-е́сть_C_end9_Lxc
+Inf:е́с%<ть # ;
:%^Fё Past_end ;
:т PastVrbAdv_9_end ;
:ёт PastAct_Lxc ;

LEXICON св_нп_7b/b_(-т-)9_ё_Lxc
+V+Perf+IV:ё%^t Perf_Infи_C_end9_Lxc ;
+V+Perf+IV:ет Perf_Fut_1_end ;

!====================================== Stem type 8 ======================================
!                                           чь
! No present verbal adverb

LEXICON св_8a
+V+Perf+IV: Perf_Inf_C_stem ;
+V+Perf+IV: Perf_Fut_1_stem ;
+V+Perf+TV: Perf_Inf_C_stem ;
+V+Perf+TV: Perf_Fut_1_stem ;

LEXICON св_8a_R
+V+Perf+IV: Perf_Inf_stem_R ;
+V+Perf+IV: Perf_Fut_1_stem ;

LEXICON св_8a/b?_лечь
св_нп_8a/b_лечь ;
+V+Perf+TV:ёг Perf_Inf_C_end ;
+V+Perf+TV:я́г Perf_Fut_1_stem ;

LEXICON св_нп_8a/b_лечь
+V+Perf+IV:ёг Perf_Inf_C_end ;
+V+Perf+IV:я́г Perf_Fut_1_stem ;

LEXICON св_8a/b_R_-лечься
+V+Perf+IV:ёг Perf_Inf_end_R ;
+V+Perf+IV:я́г Perf_Fut_1_stem_R ;

LEXICON нсв_8b
+V+Impf+IV: Impf_Inf_C_stem ;
+V+Impf+IV: Impf_Pres_1_end ;
+V+Impf+TV: Impf_Inf_C_stem ;
+V+Impf+TV: Impf_Pres_1_end ;

LEXICON св_8b
+V+Perf+IV: Perf_Inf_C_stem ;
+V+Perf+IV: Perf_Fut_1_end ;
+V+Perf+TV: Perf_Inf_C_stem ;
+V+Perf+TV: Perf_Fut_1_end ;

LEXICON св_8b_R
+V+Perf+IV: Perf_Inf_stem_R ;
+V+Perf+IV: Perf_Fut_1_end_R ;

LEXICON нсв_8b/b
нсв_нп_8b/b ;
+V+Impf+TV: Impf_Inf_C_end ;
+V+Impf+TV: Impf_Pres_1_end ;

LEXICON нсв_нп_8b/b
+V+Impf+IV: Impf_Inf_C_end ;
+V+Impf+IV: Impf_Pres_1_end ;

LEXICON нсв_8b/b_R
+V+Impf+IV: Impf_Inf_end_R ;
+V+Impf+IV: Impf_Pres_1_end_R ;

LEXICON нсв_8b/b_жечь
+V+Impf+IV:%^Fёг Impf_Inf_C_end ;
+V+Impf+IV:г Impf_Pres_1_end ;
+V+Impf+TV:%^Fёг Impf_Inf_C_end ;
+V+Impf+TV:г Impf_Pres_1_end ;
