src/fst/morphology/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON Verb
плести:плё%^t нсв_7b/b_(-т-)_ё "weight: 1.8685495662197937" ;
мести:мё%^t нсв_7b/b_(-т-)_ё "weight: 1.1281868767255503" ;
плестись:плёт нсв_7b/b_(-т-)_ё_R "weight: 1.1281868767255503" ; ! устар._плелся/
гнести:гнё%^t нсв_7b/b_(-т-)9_ё "weight: 2.0824293861648746" ;
стричь:стри́г нсв_8b "weight: 3.2552916750903576" ;
беречь:берёг нсв_8b/b ;
стеречь:стерёг нсв_8b/b ;
беречься:берёг нсв_8b/b_R ;
волочься:воло́к нсв_8b/b_R ;
влечь:влёк нсв_8b/b "weight: 3.2127631546598807" ; ! имеется_прич._страд._наст._(устар.)_влеко/мый
жечь:ж нсв_8b/b_жечь ;
брести:бр нсв_нп_7b/b_(-д-)_ё_(но_прич._прош._е/дший) "weight: 2.835757052823486" ;
расти:р нсв_нп_7b/b_(-ст-)_прош._рос,_росла/,_ро/сший "weight: 4.235057421204203" ;
цвести:цв нсв_нп_7b/b_(-т-)_ё_(но_прич._прош._е/тший) "weight: 3.5235132697949005" ;
везти:в нсв_нп_7b/b_безл. "weight: 2.6053081314452124" ;
течь:тёк нсв_нп_8b/b "weight: 3.1850917280620226" ;
погрести:погр св_7b/b_(-б-)_ё "weight: 3.421549431436995" ;
подскрести:подскр св_7b/b_(-б-)_ё ;
отгрестись:отгр св_7b/b_(-б-)_ё_R ;
проскрестись:проскр св_7b/b_(-б-)_ё_R ;
привестись:прив св_7b/b_(-д-)_R_безл. ;
довестись:дов св_7b/b_(-д-)_R_безл. ;
испрясться:испря́д св_7b/b_(-д-)_R ;
отпрясться:отпря́д св_7b/b_(-д-)_R ;
наблюсти:наблю́%^d св_7b/b_(-д-)9 "weight: 1.429216872389531" ;
соблюсти:соблю́%^d св_7b/b_(-д-)9 "weight: 3.4011881487892874" ;
развести:разв св_7b/b_(-д-)9_ё_(но_прич._прош._е/дший) "weight: 3.7164585835678787" ;
привести:прив св_7b/b_(-д-)9_ё_(но_прич._прош._е/дший) "weight: 4.607906112165121" ;
взвестись:взв св_7b/b_(-д-)9_ё_R_(но_прич._прош._е/дшийся)_прош._м_вёл ;
свестись:св св_7b/b_(-д-)9_ё_R_(но_прич._прош._е/дшийся)_прош._м_вёл ;
упасти:упа́с св_7b/b_(-с-) ;
сотрясти:сотря́с св_7b/b_(-с-) "weight: 1.1281868767255503" ;
упастись:упа́с св_7b/b_(-с-)_R ;
стрястись:стря́с св_7b/b_(-с-)_R ;
преподнести:преподн св_7b/b_(-с-)9_ё "weight: 2.8002847346612674" ;
донести:дон св_7b/b_(-с-)9_ё "weight: 2.450406171459469" ;
разнестись:разн св_7b/b_(-с-)9_ё_R ;
принестись:прин св_7b/b_(-с-)9_ё_R ;
разрастись:разр св_7b/b_(-ст-)_R_прош._ро/сся,_росла/сь,_ро/сшийся "weight: 2.9574906495565747" ;
срастись:ср св_7b/b_(-ст-)_R_прош._ро/сся,_росла/сь,_ро/сшийся "weight: 2.8183829567540637" ;
поплести:попл св_7b/b_(-т-)9_ё ;
обмести:обм св_7b/b_(-т-)9_ё ;
изобрести:изобр св_7b/b_(-т-)9_ё_(но_прич._прош._е/тший) "weight: 3.6480148705012687" ;
приобрести:приобр св_7b/b_(-т-)9_ё_(но_прич._прош._е/тший) "weight: 4.113388735090122" ;
сползтись:спо́лз св_7b/b_R ;
расползтись:распо́лз св_7b/b_R "weight: 1.7302468680535124" ;
ввезти:ввёз св_7b/b9_ё "weight: 2.8565406587467783" ;
взвезти:взвёз св_7b/b9_ё ;
переползти:перепо́лз св_7b/bs ;
оползти:опо́лз св_7b/bs ;
допрясть:допря́д св_7b/c_(-д-) ;
отпрясть:отпря́д св_7b/c_(-д-) ;
выстричь:в%^Yстриг св_8a "weight: 1.9411002333684055" ;
выпрячь:в%^Yпряг св_8a "weight: 1.1281868767255503" ;
высечься:в%^Yсек св_8a_R ;
выпрячься:в%^Yпряг св_8a_R ;
облечь:обл св_8a/b?_лечь "weight: 3.1127141900693425" ;
приулечься:приул св_8a/b_R_-лечься ;
поулечься:поул св_8a/b_R_-лечься ;
перестричь:перестри́г св_8b "weight: 1.1281868767255503" ;
простричь:простри́г св_8b ;
остричься:остри́г св_8b_R ;
отстричься:отстри́г св_8b_R ;
приползти:припо́лз св_нп_7b/b ;
сползти:спо́лз св_нп_7b/b "weight: 2.0312768637174936" ;
прибрести:прибр св_нп_7b/b_(-д-)9_ё_(но_прич._прош._е/дший) ;
отбрести:отбр св_нп_7b/b_(-д-)9_ё_(но_прич._прош._е/дший) ;
надрасти:надр св_нп_7b/b_(-ст-)_прош._ро/с,_-ла/,_-ший ;
возрасти:возр св_нп_7b/b_(-ст-)_прош._ро/с,_-ла/,_-ший "weight: 3.5235132697949005" ;
рассвести:рассве%^t св_нп_7b/b_(-т-)_безл. ;
повезти:повез св_нп_7b/b_безл. ;
подвезти:подвёз св_нп_7b/b_безл. "weight: 1.9411002333684055" ;
подлечь:подл св_нп_8a/b_лечь "weight: 1.1281868767255503" ;
полечь:пол св_нп_8a/b_лечь "weight: 1.429216872389531" ;
счесть:с%^oч св_7b/b_(-т-)9_-честь "weight: 3.0896079707919983" ;
причесть:прич св_7b/b_(-т-)9_-честь ;
LEXICON LexicalizedParticiple
замести:зам св_7b/b_(-т-)9_ё_Lxc "weight: 2.590584874624506" ;
почесть:поч св_7b/b_(-т-)9_-честь_Lxc "weight: 2.274314912403788" ;
